Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-511 Tender of payment by buyer;
payment by check. (1) Unless otherwise agreed tender of payment is a
condition to the seller's duty to tender and complete any delivery.

(2) Tender of payment is sufficient when made
by any means or in any manner current in the ordinary course of business unless
the seller demands payment in legal tender and gives any extension of time
reasonably necessary to procure it.

(3) Subject to the provisions of this chapter
on the effect of an instrument on an obligation (section 490:3-310), payment by
check is conditional and is defeated as between the parties by dishonor of the
check on due presentment. [L 1965, c 208, §2-511; HRS §490:2-511; am L 1997, c
32, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next